Wyoming, session 2025, SF0133.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-124 is created to read:

1-39-124. Liability; parental rights.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 14-2-206.

SF0133

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0706
Section 2. W.S. 1-39-104(a) and 14-2-206 by creating
a new subsection (d) are amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112, 1-39-122 and 1-39-123 and
1-39-122 through 1-39-124. Any immunity in actions based on
a contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

14-2-206. Protection of parental rights;
applicability.

(d) A person whose parental right as provided under
this section has been infringed or will be infringed in
SF0133

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0706
violation of this section may assert the violation or
impending violation as a claim or defense in a judicial or
administrative proceeding, regardless of whether the state
or one of its political subdivisions is a party to the
proceeding. The person asserting the claim or defense may
obtain appropriate relief, including relief against the
state or its political subdivisions. Appropriate relief
includes, but is not limited to, injunctive relief,
declaratory relief, compensatory damages and costs and
attorney fees.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0133